Illinois, session 104th, SB755.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Water Company Invested Capital Tax Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 625/1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1411)7    Sec. 1. Short Title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the "Water Company Invested Capital Tax Act".9(Source: P.A. 82-274.)